North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22B. Appropriations from the North Carolina Political Parties Financing Fund.

§§ 163-278.41 through 163-278.45.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 38.1(c), effective July 1, 2013.

History.
S. 163-278.41; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1298, s. 2; 1983, c. 700, s. 5; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1063, s. 3; 1991, c. 347, s. 1; c. 397, s. 1; 2003-434, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 14; repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective July 1,
2013. s. 163-278.42; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1298, s. 2; 1983, c. 700, ss. 1-4; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 866; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1063, s. 3; 1991, c. 397, s. 1; c. 636, s. 20(b); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 10B; 1993,
c. 553, s. 70; 2009-534, s. 10.1; repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.43; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1298, s. 2; 1979, c. 926, s. 1; 1985, c. 259; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1063, s. 3; 1991, c. 347, s. 2; c.
397, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 10C; repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.44; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1298, s. 2; 1987, c. 565, s. 18; 1993, c. 539, s. 1119; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c);
repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective July 1, 2013. s. 163-278.45; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1298, s. 2; repealed by 2013-381, s. 44.1, effective July 1, 2013.